Tennessee statutes. Title 31 Descent And Distribution
Chapter 1

General Provisions

31-1-101. Title definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Child” includes any individual, adopted or natural born, entitled to take as a child under this title by intestate succession from the parent whose relationship is involved and excludes any person who is only a stepchild, a foster child, a grandchild or any more remote descendant;

“Devise,” when used as a noun, means a testamentary disposition of real or personal property. “Devise,” when used as a verb, means to dispose of real or personal property by will;

“Devisee” means any person designated in a will to receive a devise. In the case of a devise to an existing trust or trustee, or to a trustee or trust described by a will, the trust or trustee is the devisee and the beneficiaries are not devisees;

“Distributee” means any person who has received property of a decedent from the personal representative other than as a creditor or purchaser;

“Heirs” means those persons, including the surviving spouse, who are entitled under the statutes of intestate succession to the property of a decedent;

“Issue” of a person means all the person's lineal descendants, adopted as well as natural born, of all generations, with the relationship of parent and child at each generation being determined by the definitions of child and parent contained in this title;

“Parent” includes any person entitled to take, or who would be entitled to take if the child, adopted or natural born, died without a will, as a parent under this title by intestate succession from the child whose relationship is in question and excludes any person who is only a stepparent, foster parent, or grandparent;

“Personal representative” includes executor, administrator, successor personal representative, special administrator, and persons who perform substantially the same function under the law governing their status; and

“Property” includes both real and personal property or any interest therein and means anything that may be the subject of ownership.

Acts 1977, ch. 25, § 1; T.C.A., § 31-101.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 49, 441, 444, 449, 802, 810, 817, 818.

Law Reviews.

Confused by tax reforms? Follow these 10 key rules for better estate planning in Tennessee (Dan W. Holbrook), 37 No. 8 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2001).

Ethics — Petty v. Privette: Exclusion of Attorney Liability in the Area of Estate Administration, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 687 (1993).

Future Interests—Tennessee Style (Jack D. Jones), 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 413 (1987).

Intestate Succession in Tennessee (Douglas P. Quay), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (1978).

Marital Deduction Planning Under the Tax Reform Act of 1976 (Ronald S. Borod, William H. Lawson, Jr., Clayton D. Smith), 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 181 (1977).

New-Age Babies and Age-Old Laws: The Need for an Intent-Based Approach in Tennessee to Preserve Parent-Child Succession for Children of Assisted Reproductive Technology (Jane Marie Lewis), 43 U. Mem. L. Rev. 479 (2012).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Some Whys and Wherefores of Will-Drafting — Revised (Robert L. McMurray), 15 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 2 (1979).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, II. Estates in General (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 161 (1979).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: A Fresh Look at State Asset Protection Trust Statutes, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1741 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Federalizing Principles of Donative Intent and Unanticipated Circumstances, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1931 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, Is Federalization of Charity Law All Bad? What States Can Learn from the Internal Revenue Code, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1621 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Comment, The Stored Communications Act and Digital Assets, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1729 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Destructive Federal Preemption of State Wealth Transfer Law in Beneficiary Designation Cases: Hillman Doubles Down on Egelhoff, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1665 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Disclaimers and Federalism, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1871 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Federal Visions of Private Family Support, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1835 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: In Search of the Probate Exception, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1533 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Introduction, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1531 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Probate Law Meets the Digital Age, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1697 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: The Creeping Federalization of Wealth-Transfer Law, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1635 (2014).

Symposium: The Role of Federal Law in Private Wealth Transfer: Unconstitutional Perpetual Trusts, 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1769 (2014).

31-1-102. Effect of divorce, annulment, and decree of separation.

A person who is divorced from the decedent or whose marriage to the decedent has been annulled is not a surviving spouse unless, by virtue of a subsequent marriage, the person is married to the decedent at the time of death. A decree of separation that does not terminate the status of husband and wife is not a divorce for purposes of this section.

For purposes of this title, a surviving spouse does not include:

A person who obtains or consents to a final decree or judgment of divorce from the decedent or an annulment of their marriage, which decree or judgment is not recognized as valid in this state, unless they subsequently participate in a marriage ceremony purporting to marry each to the other, or subsequently live together as husband and wife;

A person who, following a valid or invalid decree or judgment of divorce or annulment obtained by the decedent, participates in a marriage ceremony with a third person; or

A person who was a party to a valid marital dissolution agreement or a valid proceeding concluded by an order purporting to terminate all marital property rights.

Acts 1977, ch. 25, § 1; T.C.A., § 31-102; Acts 1987, ch. 390, § 2.

Cross-References. Death of former spouse, effect on alimony, § 36-5-105.

Revocation of will by divorce or annulment of marriage, § 32-1-202.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 812.

Law Reviews.

Intestate Succession in Tennessee (Douglas P. Quay), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (1978).

Protection Against Spousal Disinheritance: A Critical Analysis of Tennessee's New Forced Share System, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 561 (1998).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, II. Estates in General (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 161 (1979).

The Revocation-Upon-Divorce Doctrine: Tennessee's Need to Adopt the Broader Uniform Probate Code Approach (Hailey H. David), 39 U. Mem. L. Rev. 383 (2009).

31-1-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1977, ch. 25, § 1; 1978, ch. 763, § 1; T.C.A., § 31-103; Acts 1986, ch. 705, § 1; 1995, ch. 177, § 2; 2011, ch. 417, § 4; 2017, ch. 290, § 7; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 340, § 1, effective May 10, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 31-1-103 concerned disclaimer provisions.

31-1-104. Descent of homestead.

Unless the homestead has been converted to cash by order of the court pursuant to § 30-2-209, and distributed outright and in fee, the homestead exempt in the possession of or belonging to each head of a family shall, upon that person's death, any provision by will to the contrary notwithstanding, go to the surviving spouse during the surviving spouse's natural life, with the products of the homestead, for the surviving spouse's own use and benefit and that of the surviving spouse's family who reside with the surviving spouse, and, upon the surviving spouse's death, any provision by will to the contrary notwithstanding, it shall go to the minor children of the decedent, free from the debts of the father, mother, or children. Upon the death of the minor child or children, or their arrival of age, the land may be sold, and the proceeds distributed among the heirs of the deceased head of a family as if the head of the family had died intestate.

Upon the death of the head of a family, without surviving spouse or minor children, the land shall be subject to sale for the payment of the debts as may be legally established against the person's estate as in other cases, and the remainder distributed among the person's heirs.

Acts 1976, ch. 538, § 2; 1977, ch. 25, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., § 31-104; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 26.

Cross-References. Homestead, title 30, ch. 2, part 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 648, 649, 654, 816.

Law Reviews.

Intestate Succession in Tennessee (Douglas P. Quay), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (1978).

Collateral References.

Direction in will for payment of debts and expenses as subjecting exempt homestead to their payment. 103 A.L.R. 257.

Remarriage as affecting one's status as a “widow” or “widower” for purposes of statute of descent and distribution. 72 A.L.R. 1324.

31-1-105. Fraudulent conveyance to defeat share voidable.

Any conveyance made fraudulently to children or others, with an intent to defeat the surviving spouse of the surviving spouse's distributive or elective share, is, at the election of the surviving spouse, includable in the decedent's net estate under § 31-4-101(b), and voidable to the extent the other assets in the decedent's net estate are insufficient to fund and pay the elective share amount payable to the surviving spouse under § 31-4-101(c).

Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 1; 1977, ch. 25, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., §§ 31-105, 31-616; Acts 2002, ch. 735, § 4.

Cross-References. Elective share of surviving spouse, title 31, ch. 4.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 811, 812.

Law Reviews.

Conveyances Affecting the Surviving Spouse's Elective Share: Tennessee's Past and a Look to the Future, 57 Tenn. L. Rev. 677 (1990).

Descent and Distribution — Fraudulent Conveyances — Intent to Deprive Surviving Spouse of His or Her Distributive or Elective Share, 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 551 (1983).

Intestate Succession in Tennessee (Douglas P. Quay), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 63 (1978).

Protection Against Spousal Disinheritance: A Critical Analysis of Tennessee's New Forced Share System, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 561 (1998).

TennCare: Expanded Estate Recovery - Recover at ALL Cost, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 711 (2015).

31-1-106. Effect of felonious and intentional killing of decedent.

For purposes of this section:

“Disposition or appointment of property” includes a transfer of an item of property or any other benefit to a beneficiary designated in a governing instrument;

“Felonious and intentional killing” or “feloniously and intentionally kills” includes the felonious and intentional act of conspiring with another to kill or procure the killing of an individual decedent;

“Governing instrument” means a governing instrument executed by the decedent; and

“Revocable,” with respect to a disposition, appointment, provision, or nomination, means one under which the decedent, at the time of or immediately before death, was alone empowered, by law or under the governing instrument, to cancel the designation in favor of the killer, whether or not the decedent was then empowered to designate the decedent in place of the decedent's killer and whether or not the decedent then had capacity to exercise the power.

An individual who feloniously and intentionally kills the decedent forfeits all benefits with respect to the decedent's estate, including an intestate share, an elective share, an omitted spouse's or child's share, a homestead allowance, exempt property, and a family allowance. If the decedent died intestate, the decedent's intestate estate passes as if the killer predeceased the decedent.

The felonious and intentional killing of the decedent:

Revokes any revocable:

Disposition or appointment of property made by the decedent to the killer in a governing instrument;

Provision in a governing instrument conferring a general or nongeneral power of appointment on the killer; and

Nomination of the killer in a governing instrument to serve in any fiduciary or representative capacity, including a personal representative, executor, trustee, or agent;

Severs the interests of the decedent and killer in property held by the decedent and the killer at the time of the killing as joint tenants with the right of survivorship or as community property with the right of survivorship, transforming the interests of the decedent and killer into equal tenancies in common; and

Eliminates any right the perpetrator of the killing otherwise has to file or maintain an action for wrongful death arising out of the death of the decedent or to share in any portion of the proceeds of any wrongful death settlement or judgment resulting from a wrongful death lawsuit.

A severance under subdivision (c)(2) does not affect a third-party interest in property acquired for value and in good faith reliance on an apparent title by survivorship of the killer, unless a writing declaring the severance has been noted, registered, filed, or recorded in records that are:

Appropriate to the kind and location of the property;

In the ordinary course of transactions involving the property; and

Recorded as evidence of ownership.

Provisions of a governing instrument are to be given effect as if the killer disclaimed all provisions revoked by this section or, in the case of a revoked nomination in a fiduciary or representative capacity, as if the killer predeceased the decedent.

A wrongful acquisition of property or interest by a killer not covered by this section must be treated in accordance with the principle that a killer cannot profit from the killer's wrong.

A judgment of conviction establishing criminal accountability for the felonious and intentional killing of the decedent is conclusive evidence that the individual is the decedent's killer for purposes of this section.

Before the payor or other third party receives written notice of a claimed forfeiture or revocation under this section, the payor or other third party is not liable for having:

Made a payment or transferred an item of property or any other benefit to a beneficiary designated in a governing instrument affected by an intentional and felonious killing; or

Taken any other action in good faith reliance on the validity of the governing instrument, upon request and satisfactory proof of the decedent's death.

A payor or other third party is liable for a payment made or action taken after the payor or other third party received written notice sent pursuant to subdivision (h)(2)(A) of a claimed forfeiture or revocation under this section.

(A) Written notice of a claimed forfeiture or revocation under subdivision (h)(1) must be mailed to the payor's or other third party's main office or home by either:

Registered or certified mail, return receipt requested; or

Served upon the payor or other third party in the same manner as a summons in a civil action.

Upon receipt of written notice of a claimed forfeiture or revocation under this section, a payor or other third party may pay any amount owed or transfer or deposit any item or property held by the payor to or with the court having jurisdiction of the probate proceeding relating to the decedent's estate, or if no proceedings have been commenced, to or with the court having jurisdiction of the probate proceeding relating to decedents' estates in the county of the decedent's residence.

The court shall hold the funds or item of property and, upon its determination under this section, shall order disbursement in accordance with the court's determination.

Payments, transfers, or deposits made to or with the court discharge the payor or other third party from all claims for the value of amounts paid to or items of property transferred to or deposited with the court.

(1) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (i)(2), a person who purchases property for value and without notice, or who receives a payment or other item of property in partial or full satisfaction of a legally enforceable obligation, is not obligated under this section to return the payment, item of property, or benefit, and is not liable under this section for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit.

A person who, not for value, receives a payment, item of property, or any other benefit to which the person is not entitled under this section is obligated to return the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit to the person who is entitled to it under this section.

If this section is preempted by federal law with respect to a payment, an item of property, or any other benefit covered by this section, a person who, not for value, receives the payment, item of property, or any other benefit to which the person is not entitled under this section is obligated to return the payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally liable for the amount of the payment or the value of the item of property or benefit, to the person who would have been entitled to it as if this section was not preempted.

Acts 1976, ch. 538, § 8; T.C.A., § 31-117; Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 8; 2019, ch. 101, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 101, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to any lawsuit covered by the provisions of the act that is filed on or after April 11, 2019.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote the section which read: “Any person who kills, or conspires with another to kill, or procures to be killed, any other person from whom the first named person would inherit the property, either real or personal, or any part of the property, belonging to the deceased person at the time of the deceased person's death, or who would take the property, or any part of the property, by will, deed, or otherwise, at the death of the deceased, shall forfeit all right in the property, and the property shall go as it would have gone under § 31-2-104, or by will, deed or other conveyance, as the case may be; provided, that this section shall not apply to any killing done by accident or in self-defense.”

The 2019 amendment added (c)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 290, § 16. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 101, § 2. April 11, 2019.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 636, 811.

Law Reviews.

Conveyances Affecting the Surviving Spouse's Elective Share: Tennessee's Past and a Look to the Future, 57 Tenn. L. Rev. 677 (1990).

Paine on Procedure: The Slayer Statute (Donald F. Paine), 49 Tenn. B.J. 36 (2013).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, II. Estates in General (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 161 (1979).

31-1-107. Federal income tax refund or soil conservation payments due deceased — To whom paid.

In any case where the United States treasury department determines there exists an overpayment of federal income tax and the person in whose favor the overpayment is determined is dead at the time the overpayment of tax is to be refunded and where no administrator or executor has been appointed within sixty (60) days of the death of the deceased person, and irrespective of whether the deceased had filed a joint and several or separate income tax return, the amount of the overpayment, if not in excess of five hundred dollars ($500), shall be the sole and separate property of the decedent's survivor or survivors, if any, entitled thereto in accordance with the laws of descent and distribution of the state, and refund of the overpayment directly to the survivor or survivors by the United States shall operate as a complete acquittal and discharge to it of liability from any suit, claim or demand of whatsoever nature by any creditor of the decedent or other person.

In the event the person to whom soil conservation payments are due from the United States under the Soil Conservation and Domestic Allotment Act (16 U.S.C. § 590a et seq.) of the Congress of the United States dies before the payments are made, then the payments shall be made to the surviving spouse of that person for the use of the surviving spouse and minor children, and in the event there are minor children and no surviving spouse (the mother or father of the minor children), then and in that event the payments shall be made to the natural guardian of the minor children; and in the event there is no surviving spouse, or minor children, then the payments shall be made to those entitled under the laws of descent and distribution of the state, unless the deceased leaves a will, in which event they shall be made to those entitled under the will. All such payments shall be free from the claims of any and all creditors, except the United States.

Acts 1976, ch. 538, §§ 9, 10; T.C.A., §§ 31-118, 31-119.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 659.

31-1-108. Tenancies by the entirety unaffected.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as abolishing tenancies by the entirety.

Acts 1976, ch. 538, § 13; T.C.A., § 31-120.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 441, 444, 449.

Law Reviews.

New-Age Babies and Age-Old Laws: The Need for an Intent-Based Approach in Tennessee to Preserve Parent-Child Succession for Children of Assisted Reproductive Technology (Jane Marie Lewis), 43 U. Mem. L. Rev. 479 (2012).